North Dakota, session 69, HB1523.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - PARKS AND RECREATION DEPARTMENT - SKI
RESORT INFRASTRUCTURE GRANT - MATCHING FUNDS REQUIREMENT - ONE-TIME
FUNDING. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the strategic investment and
improvements fund in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $500,000, or so
much of the sum as may be necessary, to the parks and recreation department for the purpose
of providing a grant to a ski resort in the state for building and infrastructure repairs caused by
snow and rain damage, deferred maintenance, and equipment purchases, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The parks and recreation department may
spend the funds identified in this section only to the extent the organization has secured
matching funds from nonstate sources on a dollar-for-dollar basis. This funding is considered a
one-time funding item.
SECTION 2. EMERGENCY. This Act is declared to be an emergency measure.
Page No. 1 25.1210.02000